
Exhibit 10.22 
REAL ESTATE PURCHASE AGREEMENT 
by and between 
SBC Archway II, LLC, 
a Colorado limited liability company, 
as “Seller” 
and 
BC DEVELOPMENT CO., LLC, 
a Missouri limited liability company, 
as “Buyer” 


TABLE OF CONTENTS 
 








 
  
 
  
Page

 ARTICLE 1 - SALE OF PROPERTY
  
1





 1.1
  
Property To Be Sold
  
1

 1.2
  
Purchase and Sale
  
2

 1.3
  
Purchase Price
  
2

 1.4
  
Deposit
  
3

 1.5
  
Closing Date
  
3




 ARTICLE 2 - TITLE AND SURVEY
  
4





 2.1
  
Title and Survey
  
4

 2.2
  
Review of the Preliminary Report, Survey and UCC Searches; Objection; Approval or Termination
  
4

 2.3
  
Required Title Condition
  
5




 ARTICLE 3 - INSPECTION AND DUE DILIGENCE PERIOD
  
5





 3.1
  
Access
  
5

 3.2
  
Due Diligence Period
  
6

 3.3
  
Items to be Provided by Seller
  
6

 3.4
  
Termination of Property Contracts
  
6

 3.5
  
Buyer’s Possible Early Termination
  
6

 3.6
  
Consequences of Buyer’s Early Termination
  
7




 ARTICLE 4 - REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES AND COVENANTS
  
7





 4.1
  
Seller’s Representations
  
7

 4.2
  
Buyer’s Representations
  
11

 4.3
  
Survivability of Representations and Warranties
  
12

 4.4
  
Leasing & Other Activities Prior to Closing
  
12

 4.5
  
Indemnifications
  
13




 ARTICLE 5 - CLOSING
  
14





 5.1
  
Escrow Holder
  
14

 5.2
  
Escrow Instructions; Opening of Escrow
  
14

 5.3
  
Closing
  
15

 5.4
  
Conditions Precedent Favoring Buyer
  
15

 5.5
  
Conditions Precedent Favoring Seller
  
16

 5.6
  
Seller’s Deliveries
  
16




 ARTICLE 6 - TERMINATION AND DEFAULT
  
21





 6.1
  
Buyer Default
  
21

 6.2
  
Seller’s Default
  
21




 ARTICLE 7 - CASUALTY DAMAGE OR CONDEMNATION
  
22





 7.1
  
Casualty
  
22  
i 










 7.2
  
Condemnation
  
22




 ARTICLE 8 - REAL ESTATE COMMISSION
  
22




 ARTICLE 9 - MISCELLANEOUS
  
22





 9.1
  
Entire Agreement
  
23

 9.2
  
Binding On Successors and Assigns
  
23

 9.3
  
Assignment by Buyer
  
23

 9.4
  
Waiver
  
23

 9.5
  
Governing Law
  
23

 9.6
  
Counterparts
  
23

 9.7
  
Notices
  
23

 9.8
  
Attorneys’ Fees
  
24

 9.9
  
IRS Real Estate Sales Reporting
  
24

 9.10
  
Time Periods
  
24

 9.11
  
Modification of Agreement
  
24

 9.12
  
Further Instruments
  
24

 9.13
  
Descriptive Headings; Word Meaning
  
24

 9.14
  
Business Day
  
25

 9.15
  
Construction of Agreement
  
25

 9.16
  
Severability
  
25

 9.17
  
Exclusivity
  
25

 9.18
  
Section 1031 Exchange
  
25 SCHEDULE OF
EXHIBITS   






EXHIBIT “A”
  
LEGAL DESCRIPTION

EXHIBIT “B”
  
LIST OF PERSONAL PROPERTY

EXHIBIT “C”
  
LEASE

EXHIBIT “D”
  
CURRENT PROPERTY CONTRACTS

EXHIBIT “E”
  
FORM OF DEED

EXHIBIT “F”
  
BILL OF SALE AND ASSIGNMENT

EXHIBIT “G”
  
PROPERTY INFORMATION

EXHIBIT “H”
  
EASEMENT ESTOPPEL FORM  
ii 


REAL ESTATE PURCHASE AGREEMENT 
THIS REAL ESTATE PURCHASE AGREEMENT (this “Agreement”) is entered into as of the 15th day of June, 2010 (the “Effective
Date”), by and between SBC ARCHWAY II, LLC, a Colorado limited liability company (“Seller”), and BC DEVELOPMENT CO., LLC, a Missouri limited liability company or its assigns (“Buyer”), for the purchase of certain real
property more particularly described herein.  ARTICLE 1 - SALE OF PROPERTY 
1.1 Property To Be Sold. Subject to the terms and provisions hereof, Seller agrees to sell to Buyer and Buyer agrees to purchase
from Seller upon the terms and conditions of this Agreement:  1.1.1 All of the land described and/or shown on
Exhibit “A” attached hereto, together with all privileges, rights, easements and appurtenances belonging to such land, including without limitation, all right, title and interest (if any) of Seller in and to any streets,
alleys, passages, usufructs and other rights-of-way or appurtenances included in, adjacent to or used in connection with such land and all right, title and interest (if any) of Seller in all mineral and development rights appurtenant to such land
(collectively, the “Land”).  1.1.2 All buildings, structures and other improvements and all fixtures,
systems and facilities located on the Land (the “Improvements”).  1.1.3 All equipment, machinery,
signs and other tangible personal property of every kind and nature, if any, owned by Seller and installed, located or situated on or used in connection with the operation of the Land or Improvements, including, without limitation, the personal
property listed on Exhibit “B” attached hereto (the “Personal Property”). Notwithstanding the foregoing, there are no specific items of Personal Property located on the Land or Improvements that would not otherwise be
considered “fixtures”.  1.1.4 All of Seller’s rights in the lease and any other occupancy
agreement covering any portion of the Land or Improvements (the “Lease”), including the lease listed on Exhibit “C” attached hereto and any leases that may be subsequently entered into in accordance with this
Agreement, and including Seller’s rights to any tenant deposit held by Seller (the “Tenant Deposit”) pursuant to the Leases. 
1.1.5 All of Seller’s right, title and interest, if any, in all intangible assets of any nature relating to the Land,
the Improvements or the Personal Property, including, without limitation, all of Seller’s right, title, and interest in all (i) warranties and guaranties relating to the Improvements or Personal Property in the possession of Seller,
(ii) all use, occupancy, building and operating licenses, permits, approvals, and development rights (iii) any trade name or names used or utilized in connection with the Land and Improvements and (iv) all plans and specifications
related to the Land and Improvements, in each case to the extent that Seller may legally transfer the same (the “Intangible Property”).   
1 


1.1.6 All of Seller’s rights, if any, in all service contracts (other
than management and leasing contracts) affecting the Land or Improvements as set forth on Exhibit “D” attached hereto (the “Property Contracts”), to the extent Buyer assumes the same in accordance with
Section 3.4 below. Notwithstanding the foregoing, there are no written Property Contracts connected with the Land or Improvements. Any agreements for services connected with the Land or Improvements are oral in nature and are in place from
“month-to-month”.  1.1.7 All rights, which the Seller may have, if any, in and to any tenant data,
telephone numbers and listings, all master keys and keys to common areas, all good will, if any, and any and all other rights, privileges and appurtenances owned by Seller and related to or used in connection with the existing business operation of
the Land and Improvements (the “Miscellaneous Property”).  1.1.8 The Land and Improvements are
hereinafter sometimes referred to collectively as the “Real Property” and the Real Property, Personal Property, Leases, Tenant Deposits, Intangible Property, the Property Contracts and the Miscellaneous Property, are hereinafter sometimes
referred to collectively as the “Property.”  1.2 Purchase and Sale. Buyer agrees to purchase from Seller and
Seller agrees to sell to Buyer all of Seller’s right, title and interest in and to the Property, on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement. 
1.3 Purchase Price. 
1.3.1 The purchase price for the Property (the “Purchase Price”) shall be Seventeen Million Seven Hundred
Thousand and No/100 Dollars ($17,700,000.00). The Purchase Price shall be paid to Seller by Buyer on the Closing Date (as defined below), plus or minus all adjustments or credits as set forth herein, by wire transfer of immediately available federal
funds.  1.3.2 Seller and Buyer agree that the Purchase Price was determined based on a projected net operating
income (“Projected NOI”) of One Million Four Hundred Sixty Thousand Six Hundred Twenty Two and No/100 Dollars ($1,460,622.00), and thus a capitalization rate of 8.25% (“Capitalization Rate”). During the Due Diligence Period (as
defined below), Buyer shall review the historic operating income and expense information of the Property and Buyer shall determine, in its sole and absolute discretion, the validity of the Projected NOI. Prior to the expiration of the Due Diligence
Period (as defined below), the Buyer shall either agree that the Projected NOI is the actual net operating income of the Property and the Purchase Price will remain unchanged or Buyer may request an amendment to the Purchase Price, which Seller may
accept or decline, in Seller’s sole and absolute discretion.  1.3.3 During the Due Diligence Period (as
defined below), Buyer shall review the historical property tax information of the Property (the “Historical Property Taxes”), and Buyer shall determine the validity of such information and its impact on the net operating income of the
Property. Prior to the expiration of the Due Diligence Period (as defined below), the Buyer shall either agree that the Historical Property Taxes do not alter the Property’s net operating income and the Purchase Price will remain unchanged or
Buyer may request an amendment to the Purchase Price, which Seller may accept or decline, in Seller’s sole and absolute discretion.   
2 


1.4 Deposit. Within three (3) Business Days after the Effective Date, Buyer
shall deliver to Chicago Title Insurance Corporation, 830 East Main Street, Suite 1600, Richmond, VA 23219, Attn: Chris Newman (“Escrow Holder”), a good faith deposit in the amount of Fifty Thousand and No/100 Dollars ($50,000.00) (the
“Initial Deposit”), and within three (3) Business Days following the expiration of the Due Diligence Period (defined in Section 3.2), assuming Buyer has not previously terminated this Agreement, Buyer shall deliver to Escrow
Holder an additional good faith deposit (“Additional Deposit”) of Fifty Thousand and No/100 Dollars ($50,000.00). The Initial Deposit and the Additional Deposit shall be collectively referred to as the Deposit. The Deposit shall be held in
an insured, interest-bearing account with interest accruing for the benefit of Buyer. The Deposit (including any interest thereon) shall be applied to the Purchase Price if the Closing occurs. After the expiration of the Due Diligence Period
(defined in Section 3.2), the Deposit shall be nonrefundable to Buyer unless escrow fails to close due to (i) Seller’s breach or default under this Agreement, (ii) a failure of a representation or warranty by Seller to be true
and correct as of the Closing, (iii) a failure of a condition precedent set forth in Section 5.4, (iv) a casualty or condemnation, or (v) as otherwise expressly provided in this Agreement, and the Deposit shall constitute
liquidated damages to Seller if escrow fails to close solely as a result of Buyer’s default as provided in Section 6.1 below. In the event Buyer shall elect to terminate this Agreement or be deemed to terminate this Agreement in accordance
with its terms, the Deposit shall immediately be returned to Buyer as provided in Section 3.5 below.  1.5 Closing
Date.  1.5.1 The Closing shall take place through an escrow opened with Escrow Holder on or before the date
(the “Closing Date”) which is thirty (30) days after the expiration of the Due Diligence Period (defined in Section 3.2). Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Buyer has the right, upon five (5) Business Days’ notice to
Seller, to accelerate the Closing Date. In addition to the foregoing, the Buyer and Seller may elect to hold the Closing at such other place and on such other later date as Buyer and Seller may mutually agree in writing. For purposes of this
Agreement “Close of Escrow” or “Closing” means the date Escrow Holder disburses funds in accordance with this Agreement and is irrevocably committed to record the Deed in favor of Buyer. 
1.5.2 In addition to the foregoing, Buyer shall have the right to unilaterally extend the Closing Date from time to time,
not to exceed in the aggregate thirty (30) additional days beyond the Closing Date provided in Section 1.5.1 above provided that on or before the originally scheduled Closing Date Buyer provides written notice to the Seller (“Closing
Extension Notice”) and increases the Deposit by Fifty Thousand and No/100 Dollars ($50,000) (the “Closing Extension Deposit”). The Closing Extension Deposit shall be deemed part of the Deposit and shall be subject to terms and
conditions set forth in Section 1.4.   
3 


ARTICLE 2 - TITLE AND SURVEY 
2.1 Title and Survey. During the Due Diligence Period (defined in Section 3.2), Buyer, at Buyer’s cost and expense, may
obtain a preliminary title report or commitment (the “Preliminary Report”) from Chicago Title Insurance Corporation, 830 East Main Street, Suite 1600, Richmond, Virginia 23219, Attn: Chris Newman (the “Title Company”), together
with legible copies of all recorded encumbrances and exceptions to title as well as an existing survey, if any, from Seller. Buyer shall, at its option and at its expense, (i) conduct UCC searches covering Seller and the Property (the “UCC
Searches”) and (ii) order an update of the existing survey of the Real Property by a licensed surveyor or registered professional engineer (the “Survey”). 
2.2 Review of the Preliminary Report, Survey and UCC Searches; Objection; Approval or Termination. On or before the last day of
the Due Diligence Period, with respect to the Preliminary Report or within ten (10) days after delivery to Buyer of any supplement to the Preliminary Title Report (“Supplemental Report”), with respect only to matters not set forth in
the Preliminary Report but not set forth in the Supplemental Report, Buyer may deliver to Seller a notice (the “Title Objection Notice”) setting forth (i) any matters shown on the Preliminary Report, Supplemental Report, Survey or UCC
Searches to which Buyer objects and requires be eliminated, (ii) any modifications, supplements or other modifications of the legal description, description of exceptions or other matters set forth in the Preliminary Report, Supplemental Report
or Survey, and (iii) any endorsements or other affirmative title insurance coverage required to be included in the Title Policy (collectively, clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) herein shall be referred to hereinafter as the “Title
Objections”). Buyer may make its determination of whether any of the matters contained in the Preliminary Report, Supplemental Report, Survey or UCC Searches (as applicable) are appropriate or are objectionable in its sole discretion.
Buyer’s failure to give the Title Objection Notice shall be deemed to constitute Buyer’s disapproval of matters disclosed in the Preliminary Report, Supplemental Report, Survey, or UCC Searches (as applicable) and this Agreement shall
terminate. If Buyer delivers a Title Objection Notice, Seller shall have five (5) Business Days from the receipt of Buyer’s notice (the “Seller’s Response Period”) to provide Buyer with written notice of Seller’s
election to remove or otherwise cure to Buyer’s satisfaction the Title Objections prior to the Closing (“Seller Response Notice”); provided however, and notwithstanding Buyer’s inclusion or lack thereof in any Title Objection
Notice, Seller shall be obligated to eliminate all monetary liens or encumbrances, and any exceptions created or consented to by Seller after the Effective Date (collectively, the “Required Cure Items”), unless approved in writing by
Buyer, which Seller shall cause to be released at Closing. With the exception of the Required Cure Items, if Seller fails to deliver the Seller Response Notice within the Seller Response Period, then Seller shall be deemed to have elected to cure
all of the disapproved matters set forth in Buyer’s Title Objection Notice. If Seller timely delivers notice of election not to cure a disapproved item, then Buyer may either (i) elect to terminate this Agreement, or (ii) waive in
writing its prior disapproval of such item and accept title subject to such previously disapproved item by delivering notice of Buyer’s election to Seller within five (5) Business Days after the receipt of the Seller Response Notice (the
“Buyer Response Period). If Buyer fails to deliver its notice of election to terminate this Agreement within the Buyer Response Period, Buyer shall be deemed to have approved of Seller’s Response Notice and any items Seller has elected not
to cure shall be deemed permitted as part of the Required Title Condition. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to this Section 2.2, the provisions of Section 3.5 shall apply. 
 
4 


2.3 Required Title Condition. Title to the Property shall be conveyed to Buyer
subject only to the following permitted encumbrances: (a) current, non-delinquent real estate taxes and assessments, (B) the matters set forth in the Preliminary Report and permitted as part of the Required Title Condition, (c) the
Lease, and (d) any other matters approved in writing by Buyer.  ARTICLE 3 - INSPECTION AND DUE DILIGENCE PERIOD 
 3.1 Access. From and after the Effective Date through the Closing, Buyer, personally or through its authorized agent
or representatives, shall be entitled, upon reasonable advance notice to Seller, to enter upon the Property during normal business hours and shall have the right to make such investigations, including tenant interviews, appraisals, engineering
studies, soil tests, environmental studies and underwriting analyses, as Buyer deems reasonably necessary or advisable. Buyer shall have the right to conduct a Phase I environmental site assessment, and, if necessary, a Phase II environmental site
assessment (including soils borings, soil sampling and, if relevant, ground water testing, and invasive sampling of building materials with respect to the Property). Buyer’s activities at the Property shall be conducted in such a manner so as
not to unreasonably interfere with the occupancy of the tenant or its employees, licensees or invitees. Regarding Buyer’s investigations, in addition to the forgoing: 
a. Upon Seller’s request, Buyer must deliver evidence to Seller that Buyer has insurance for its proposed inspection
activities, in amounts and with coverages that are substantially the same as those maintained by Seller or in such lesser amounts or with such lesser coverages as are reasonably satisfactory to Seller; 
b. Buyer must notify Seller in advance of Buyer’s plans to conduct tests so that Seller may be present during the
tests;  c. if the Land or Improvements are altered because of Buyer’s inspections, Buyer must return the
Land or Improvements to their pre-inspection condition promptly after the alteration occurs;  d. Buyer must
deliver to Seller copies of all inspection reports that Buyer prepares or receives from third-party consultants or contractors within three (3) days after their preparation or receipt; 
e. Buyer must abide by any other reasonable entry rules imposed by Seller; 
f. Buyer will indemnify, defend, and hold Seller harmless from any loss, reasonable attorney’s fees, expenses, or
claims arising out of Buyer’s investigation of the Land or Improvements, except repair or remediation of existing conditions discovered by Buyer’s inspections. Furthermore, Buyer agrees to keep the Property free from mechanic’s lien
claims related to Buyer’s investigative work under this Article 3. The obligations of Buyer under this provision will survive termination of this Agreement and Closing; and 
 
5 


g. Buyer releases Seller and those persons acting on Seller’s behalf
from all claims and causes of action (including claims for attorney’s fees and court and other costs) resulting from Buyer’s investigation of the Land or Improvements. 
3.2 Due Diligence Period. Buyer shall have sixty (60) days from the later of (i) the Effective Date or (ii) the
date on which Buyer receives all of the Property Information (as defined in Section 3.3) (the “Due Diligence Period”) to physically inspect the Property, review the economic data, underwrite the tenants and review the Leases, conduct
appraisals, perform examinations of the physical condition of the Improvements, examine the Property for the presence of Hazardous Materials (as defined below), and to otherwise conduct such due diligence review of the Property and all of the items
to be furnished by Seller to Buyer pursuant to Section 3.3 below, and all records and other materials related thereto as Buyer deems appropriate. 
3.3 Items to be Provided by Seller. No later than one (1) Business Day after the Effective Date, Seller shall deliver to
Buyer (by electronic or overnight delivery) accurate and complete copies of all of the information set forth on Exhibit “G” attached hereto and incorporated herein (“Property Information”). In addition to the foregoing
deliveries, Seller shall make available to Buyer for inspection and copying at Seller’s offices in Greenwood, Colorado the originals of any of the Property Information and any and all other documents, instruments, studies, reports, surveys,
maps, files, correspondence (including without limitation, tenant correspondence files), reports and other materials related to the Property and not included in the Property Information. Seller agrees to update, provide and make available to Buyer
new Property Information as it becomes available. Where financial statements are required, Buyer, at its sole cost and expense, shall have the right (but not the obligation) to have its auditor, BDO Seidman, LLP, or another qualified auditor of
Buyer’s choosing conduct an audit of the property financial statements and other information. Where financial statements are required to be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), to the extent Seller does
not have such financial statements, Buyer shall have the right (but not the obligation), at its sole cost and expense, to have its accountants prepare Seller’s financial statements in accordance with GAAP. 
3.4 Termination of Property Contracts. Prior to the expiration of the Due Diligence Period, Buyer shall notify Seller of any
Property Contract which Buyer wishes to retain and assume as of the Closing. Unless otherwise expressly agreed to by Buyer, all Property Contracts, including without limitation all property management agreements and leasing agreements, shall be
terminated by Seller, at Seller’s expense, as of the Closing Date.  3.5 Buyer’s Possible Early Termination.
Buyer shall have the right to approve in Buyer’s sole and absolute discretion, the Property, the Property Information, the Preliminary Report, any Supplemental Report, the Survey, the UCC Searches, or any other matter whatsoever regarding the
Property. On or before the last day of the Due Diligence Period, Buyer shall   
6 



provide written notice (“Disapproval Notice”) to Seller and Escrow Holder that Buyer has disapproved the Property. Buyer’s failure to provide a Disapproval Notice upon the
expiration of the Due Diligence Period shall be deemed an approval of the Property. At any time prior to the expiration of the Due Diligence Period, Buyer may provide a Disapproval Notice to Seller and Escrow Holder disapproving the Property. Upon
the giving of a Disapproval Notice, this Agreement shall automatically terminate and the provisions of Section 3.6 shall apply. 
3.6 Consequences of Buyer’s Early Termination. Upon the termination of this Agreement pursuant to Section 2.2 or
Section 3.5, this Agreement shall immediately terminate, and the parties shall be released from all further obligations under this Agreement (except with respect to any provisions that by their terms survive a termination of this Agreement);
provided, however, that if Seller is in default hereunder at the time of such termination, Section 6.2 shall additionally apply. Provided Buyer is not then in default under the terms of this Agreement, Escrow Holder shall pay the entire Deposit
(including any interest thereon) to Buyer not later than one (1) Business Day following receipt of Buyer’s Disapproval Notice (as long as the then-current investment of the Deposit can be liquidated in one (1) Business Day).
Notwithstanding the foregoing, in any event, Escrow Holder shall not be required to obtain the consent of any party to release the Deposit to Buyer in accordance with this Section 3.6. 
ARTICLE 4 - REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES AND COVENANTS 
4.1 Seller’s Representations. Except as otherwise disclosed in writing to Buyer, Seller warrants and represents to Buyer as
follows:  4.1.1 Seller is a duly formed and validly existing limited liability company organized under the laws
of Colorado. Seller has full power and authority to enter into this Agreement, to perform this Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and all documents contemplated
hereby by Seller have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary action on the part of Seller and all required consents and approvals have been duly obtained and will not result in a breach of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute
a default under any indenture, agreement or instrument to which Seller is a party. This Agreement is a legal, valid and binding obligation of Seller, enforceable against Seller in accordance with its terms, subject to the effect of applicable
bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, arrangement, moratorium or other similar laws affecting the rights of creditors generally. 
4.1.2 Seller has good and marketable title to the Property. There are no outstanding rights of first refusal, rights of
reverter or options to purchase relating to the Property or any interest therein. To Seller’s knowledge, there are no unrecorded or undisclosed documents or other matters which affect title to the Property. Subject to the Leases, Seller has
enjoyed the continuous and uninterrupted quiet possession, use and operation of the Property, without material complaint or objection by any person. 
4.1.3 Seller is not a “foreign person” within the meaning of Section 1445(f) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended (the “Code”).   
7 


4.1.4 Neither Seller nor any of its affiliates, nor any of their respective
partners, members, shareholders or other equity owners, and none of their respective employees, officers, directors, representatives or agents is, nor will they become, a person or entity with whom United States persons or entities are restricted
from doing business under regulations of the Office of Foreign Asset Control (“OFAC”) of the Department of the Treasury (including those named on OFAC’s Specially Designated and Blocked Persons List) or under any statute, executive
order (including, without limitation, the September 24, 2001, Executive Order Blocking Property and Prohibiting Transactions with Persons Who Commit, Threaten to Commit, or Support Terrorism), or other governmental action, and is not and will
not engage in any dealings or transactions or be otherwise associated with such persons or entities.  4.1.5 The
authorization, consent, and approval of a governmental authority is required for the Closing herein described to occur. However, Seller will use its reasonable best efforts to obtain such approval within fifteen (15) days of the Effective Date
of this Agreement.  4.1.6 There are no actions, suits or proceedings pending, or, to the best of Seller’s
knowledge, threatened (a) affecting Seller, which if determined adversely, would affect its ability to perform its obligations hereunder; or (b) against any portion of the Property. 
4.1.7 Seller has not (a) made a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, (b) filed any voluntary
petition in bankruptcy or suffered the filing of an involuntary petition by Seller’s creditors, (c) suffered the appointment of a receiver to take possession of all or substantially all of Seller’s assets, (d) suffered the
attachment or other judicial seizure of all, or substantially all, of Seller’s assets, (e) admitted in writing its inability to pay its debts as they come due, or (f) made an offer of settlement, extension or composition to its
creditors generally.  4.1.8 To the best of Seller’s knowledge, neither the execution, delivery or
performance of this Agreement nor compliance herewith (a) conflicts or will conflict with or results or will result in a breach of or constitutes or will constitute a default under (i) the articles of incorporation and by-laws or other
organization certificate and/or partnership or operating agreement of Seller, or (ii) any law or any order, writ, injunction or decree of any court or governmental authority, or (b) results in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge
or encumbrance upon its property pursuant to any such agreement or instrument.  4.1.9 Seller has not entered
into any material commitments or agreements with any governmental authorities or agencies affecting the Property except as provided in the Property Information. 
4.1.10 There is no pending, threatened or contemplated condemnation proceeding relating to the Property to the best of
Seller’s knowledge, and Seller has received no written notice from any governmental agency or official to the effect that any such proceeding is contemplated. 
4.1.11 Seller has delivered or made available to Buyer a complete copy of the Lease and other occupancy agreements
affecting the Property. The Lease is in full force and effect. Seller is “landlord” or “lessor” under and is entitled to assign to Buyer, without tenant’s consent (subject to Section 4.1.5, above), the Lease at Closing.
Neither Seller nor the tenant   
8 



shall be in default under the Lease and at Closing there will exist no condition or circumstance or written notice of any condition or circumstance which, with the passage of time, would
constitute a default of either Seller or the tenant. The tenant is not asserting any claim of offset or other defense in respect of its or Seller’s obligations under the Lease, and there are no unresolved disputes relating to the calculation of
additional rent under the Lease. There are no pending or incomplete tenant improvements and unpaid tenant improvement costs and leasing commissions with respect to the Lease and no pecuniary obligation to tenant and brokers has vested or accrued and
is owed by Seller, except that shall be fully completed and paid in full prior to Closing.  4.1.12 The
financial statements of Property operations provided by Seller, including, but not limited to, statements of revenue and expenses, balance sheets and statements of cash flow are true, correct and complete in all material respects. Such financial
statements present fairly, in all material respects, the information contained therein for the periods indicated therein. All expenses associated with Property operations have been recorded in Seller’s general ledger. Seller agrees to provide
such other reasonable information requested by Buyer provided such request may not delay the Closing.  4.1.13
Seller agrees to make such further and other reasonable representations and warranties regarding the financial statements of the Property and the Seller, including, but not limited to representations and warranties related to statements of revenue
and expenses, and Seller’s internal controls for the prevention and detection of fraud, as may be reasonably required of Seller by Buyer’s auditor. Seller further agrees to reasonably cooperate with Buyer’s auditor in connection with
delivery of any audit opinions or comfort letters relating to audited financial statements prepared by Buyer’s Auditor and consents to the dissemination of any such audited financial statements, opinions or letters as may be required by Buyer
or its auditor for any purpose, including but not limited to their inclusion in any registration statements, prospectuses, or similar documents in connection with syndications, private placements or public offerings of securities or interest by
Buyer, or any of Buyer’s affiliates or assigns and any reporting requirements for the same under applicable federal and state laws. All costs and expenses associated with any reports, opinions or letters required by this section shall be borne
by Buyer.  4.1.14 Seller has delivered or made available to Buyer true and complete copies of all management
and leasing contracts to which Seller is a party and affecting the Property and, to the best of Seller’s knowledge, all other contracts, agreements, documents, reports, materials and information that are in Seller’s possession or control
with respect to the ownership, use and/or operation of the Property. Seller has not, within the last year, received any written notice of any default under any Property Contract or other such contract or agreement that has not been cured or waived.
 4.1.15 There are no debts or other liabilities or obligations relating to the Lease or the Property, including
but not limited to tenant improvement costs and leasing commissions, vesting, accruing and/or arising prior to Closing which will be due or payable from or by Buyer. 
4.1.16 Seller has not received any written notice from, and is otherwise aware of no grounds for, any association,
declarant or easement holder requiring the correction of any condition with respect to the Property, or any part thereof, by reason of a violation of any restrictions or covenants recorded against the Property. 
 
9 


4.1.17 Except as disclosed in the Property Information, there are no
material defects in the structural elements of the Improvements and all improvements (including, without limitation, machinery, equipment, electrical, plumbing, heating and air conditioning systems and equipment) located on the Property are in good
mechanical working order, condition and repair, and are structurally safe and sound and have no material defect (reasonable wear and tear excepted), and, there is no material leak or material defect in any roof located upon the Property. 
4.1.18 Seller has not received any written notice from, and is otherwise aware of no grounds for, any governmental agency
requiring the correction of any condition with respect to the Property, or any part thereof, by reason of a violation of any applicable federal, state, county or municipal law, code, rule or regulation (including those respecting the Americans With
Disabilities Act), which has not been cured or waived.  4.1.19 The Property is properly zoned for its current
use. There is no pending or threatened request, application or proceeding to alter or restrict the zoning or other use restrictions applicable to the Property; there is no plan, study or effort by any governmental authority or agency or any private
party or entity that in any way affects or would affect the authorization of the current use and operation of the Property. 
4.1.20 Seller has not received any written notice of an intention to revoke any certificate of occupancy, license, or
permit issued in connection with the Property.  4.1.21 Seller has received no notice that the Property or any
portion thereof contains any form of toxic mold.  4.1.22 There are no Hazardous Materials stored on,
incorporated into, located on, present in or used on the Property in violation of, and requiring remediation under, any laws, ordinances, statutes, codes, rules or regulations as of the date of this Agreement or, upon the Close of Escrow hereunder,
in existence on the Close of Escrow. For purposes of this Agreement, the term “Hazardous Materials” shall mean any substance which is or contains: (i) any “hazardous substance” as now or hereafter defined in
Section 101(14) of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, as amended (42 U.S.C. Section 9601 et seq.) (“CERCLA”) or any regulations promulgated under CERCLA; (ii) any
“hazardous waste” as now or hereafter defined the Recourse Conservation and Recovery Act (42 U.S.C. Section 6901 et seq.) (“RCRA”) or regulations promulgated under RCRA; (iii) any substance regulated by the Toxic
Substances Control Act (15 U.S.C. Section 2601 et. seq.); (iv) gasoline, diesel fuel or other petroleum hydrocarbons; (v) asbestos and asbestos containing materials, in any form, whether friable or non-friable;
(vi) polychlorinated biphenyls; (vii) radon gas: and (viii) any additional substances or materials which are now or hereafter classified or considered to be hazardous or toxic under any laws, ordinances, statutes, codes, rules,
regulations, agreements, judgments, orders and decrees now or hereafter enacted, promulgated, or amended, of the United States, the state, the county, the city or any other political subdivision in which the Property is located and any other
political subdivision, agency or instrumentality exercising jurisdiction over the owner of the Property, the Property or the use of the Property relating to pollution, the protection or regulation of human health, natural resources or the
environment, or the emission, discharge, release or threatened release of pollutants, contaminants, chemicals or industrial, toxic or hazardous substances or waste into the environment (including, without limitation, ambient air, surface water,
ground water or land or soil).   
10 


4.1.23 There are no claims pending or unpaid bills which would result in the
creation of any lien on the Property for any improvements completed or in progress, including, but not limited to, water, sewage, street paving, electrical or power improvements. There are no delinquent bills or claims in connection with any repair
of the Property or other work or material purchased in connection with the Property which will not be paid by or at the Close of Escrow or placed in escrow pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement. 
4.1.24 No treatment has been undertaken by Seller with respect to termite or similar infestation, fungi, or dry rot on the
Property other than normal periodic service, and to the best of Seller’s knowledge, there is no damage to any portion of the Property from termite or similar infestation, fungi or dry rot. 
4.1.25 Seller has received no notices or requests from any insurance company issuing any policy of insurance covering the
Property requesting the performance of any work with respect to the Property or the Improvements located thereon which has not been fully complied with. 
4.1.26 Seller shall immediately notify Buyer, in writing, of any event or condition known to Seller which occurs prior to
the Close of Escrow hereunder, which causes a change in the facts relating to, or the truth of, any of the representations or warranties. 
4.1.27 All information given by Seller to Buyer in this Agreement or in connection with the transactions contemplated
hereunder shall be true and accurate in every material respect as of the date hereof and at the Close of Escrow, and Seller has not failed to disclose any fact to Buyer necessary to make the statements herein or otherwise provided in connection with
the transactions contemplated hereunder not misleading and Seller has no knowledge or information of any facts, circumstances, or conditions that are inconsistent with the representations and warranties contained herein. Seller shall promptly inform
Buyer in writing if there occurs any (i) material adverse change in the condition, financial or otherwise, of the Property, or the operation thereof, at any time prior to the Close of Escrow or (ii) if any information, document, agreement
or other material delivered to Buyer is amended, superseded, modified or supplemented.  4.1.28 The General
Services Administration, per the terms of the Lease of the Property, may reimburse real property taxes over the Lease-established “base tax year” amount as detailed in the Lease, and which are paid by the owners of the Property upon a
receipt of proof of payment of such taxes by the owner. Seller further represents that all real property taxes for the year immediately preceding the year of Closing have heretofore been paid. 
4.2 Buyer’s Representations. Buyer makes the following representations and warranties to Seller as follows: 
4.2.1 Buyer is a duly formed and validly existing limited liability company in good standing under the laws of the State
of Missouri.   
11 


4.2.2 Buyer has full right, power and authority and is duly authorized to
enter into this Agreement and to perform each of these covenants on its part to be performed hereunder and to execute and deliver and to perform its obligations under all documents required to be executed and delivered by it pursuant to this
Agreement and this Agreement constitutes the valid and legally binding obligation of Buyer, enforceable against Buyer in accordance with its terms. 
4.2.3 The execution and delivery of this Agreement has been duly authorized by all necessary action on the part of Buyer.
This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by Buyer.  4.3 Survivability of Representations and Warranties. The
representations and warranties of Seller and Buyer set forth in this Agreement are made as of the Effective Date of this Agreement and the Closing Date and shall not be deemed to be merged into or waived by the instruments of Closing, but shall
survive the Closing for a period of two (2) years from the Closing Date.  4.4 Leasing & Other Activities
Prior to Closing.  4.4.1 Leasing Activities. Except as set forth in Section 5.4 below, Seller
shall not, from the Effective Date, enter into any new leases, enter into any modification or amendment to the Lease, or consent to any sublease under the existing Lease, in each case, without the prior written consent of Buyer, which may be given
or withheld in Buyer’s sole but reasonable discretion. Seller represents that no leasing commissions, rent concessions or tenant improvement allowances will be due or are owing with respect to any Lease renewals that can be entered into as of
right by the tenant.  4.4.2 Service Contracts. Seller shall not, from the Effective Date, enter into any
new service contracts for the Property or modifications, renewals or terminations of any existing service contracts that would materially affect the Property after Closing, without the written consent of Buyer, which consent may be given or withheld
in Buyer’s sole but reasonable discretion.  4.4.3 Conducting Business. At all times prior to
Closing, Seller shall continue to (i) conduct business with respect to the Property in the same manner in which said business has been heretofore conducted and (ii) insure the Property substantially as it is currently insured. Seller
represents that the Property is currently insured.  4.4.4 Encumbrances. At all times prior to Closing,
Seller shall not sell, mortgage, pledge, encumber, hypothecate or otherwise transfer or dispose of all or any part of the Property or any interest therein without the prior written consent of Buyer, which may be given or withheld in Buyer’s
sole but reasonable discretion; and Seller shall not consent to, approve or otherwise take any action with respect to zoning or any other governmental rules or regulations presently applicable to all or any part of the Property. 
4.4.5 Monthly Operating Statements. Seller shall provide Buyer with a copy of the monthly operating statement for
the operation of the Property on or before the ten (10) days after the end of each month commencing with the month during which the Effective Date occurs, and continuing for each full calendar month thereafter until the Closing Date.
  
12 


4.4.6 Cooperation with Buyer’s Lender. Seller agrees to
reasonably cooperate with Buyer’s lender, provide lender’s agents with reasonable access to the Property, and comply with lender’s reasonable requests for documentation or affidavits regarding the operation, condition, and ownership
of the Property.  4.4.7 Compliance with Representations. Seller will not take or cause to be taken any
action or fail to perform any obligation which would cause any of the representations or warranties contained in this Agreement to be untrue as of the Close of Escrow. 
4.5 Indemnifications. 
4.5.1 Seller’s Indemnity. In addition to any other applicable rights under this Agreement, Seller agrees to
indemnify, defend and hold Buyer and its officers, directors, partners, members, agents, employees, affiliates, attorneys, heirs, successors and assigns (collectively, “Buyer’s Indemnified Parties”) harmless from and against any and
all liabilities, liens, claims, damages, costs, expenses, suits or judgments paid or incurred by any of Buyer’s Indemnified Parties and all expenses related thereto, including, without limitation, court costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees
arising out of or in any way connected or related to (i) the ownership, maintenance, or operation of the Property and accruing prior to Closing, (ii) any breach or nonperformance by Seller of any provision or covenant contained in this
Agreement or in any certificate or other instrument or document furnished (or to be furnished) by Seller with respect to the transactions contemplated hereunder, (iii) any liability arising because of a breach of lease, breach of contract,
breach of the Loan Documents, or other matter related to the Property which occurred or arose or is alleged to have occurred or arisen prior to Closing and which is due to actions taken by Seller, or (iv) the breach of any representation or
warranty of Seller contained in this Agreement. The indemnities set forth in this Section shall survive Closing without limitation. Provided, however, that the indemnities set forth in this Section shall not apply to the extent of any item that by
this Agreement specifically becomes the obligation of Buyer after the Closing pursuant to the terms and conditions of this Agreement. 
4.5.2 Buyer’s Indemnity. In addition to any other applicable rights under this Agreement, Buyer agrees to
indemnify, defend and hold Seller and its officers, directors, partners, members, agents, employees, affiliates, attorneys, heirs, successors and assigns (collectively, “Seller’s Indemnified Parties”) harmless from and against any and
all liabilities, liens, claims, damages, costs, expenses, suits or judgments paid or incurred by any of Seller’s Indemnified Parties and all expenses related thereto, including, without limitation, court costs and reasonable attorneys’
fees arising out of or in any way connected or related to (i) the ownership, maintenance, or operation of the Property and arising from events or conditions that occur entirely after the Closing, (ii) any breach or nonperformance by Buyer
of any provision or covenant contained in this Agreement or in any certificate or other instrument or document furnished (or to be furnished) by Buyer with respect to the transactions contemplated hereunder, (iii) any liability arising because
of a breach of lease, breach of contract or other matter related to the Property which occurred or is alleged to have occurred after Closing and which is due to actions taken by Buyer, or (iv) the breach of any representation, warranty or
covenant of Buyer   
13 



contained in this Agreement. The indemnities set forth in this Section shall survive Closing without limitation. Provided, however, that the indemnities set forth in this Section shall not apply
to the extent of any item that specifically remains the obligation of Seller after the Closing pursuant to the terms and conditions of this Agreement. 
ARTICLE 5 - CLOSING 
5.1 Escrow Holder. The Closing shall occur through the Escrow opened at the Escrow Holder named in Section 1.4. Escrow Holder
is designated, authorized and instructed to act as Escrow Holder pursuant to the terms of this Agreement.  5.2 Escrow
Instructions; Opening of Escrow. This Agreement shall constitute initial escrow instructions to Escrow Holder. The parties shall execute any additional escrow instructions reasonably required by Escrow Holder to consummate the transaction
provided for herein (including Escrow Holder’s so-called “general provisions”); provided, however, such additional escrow instructions shall not modify the provisions of this Agreement, unless such instructions (i) clearly
identify the specific provisions being modified, (ii) state the modification in full, and (ii) are signed by both parties. Within two (2) Business Days after the Effective Date, the parties shall open escrow by delivering three
(3) executed originals of this Agreement to Escrow Holder (“Opening of Escrow”). Upon receipt of the Agreement, Escrow Holder shall acknowledge the Opening of Escrow as described below and its agreement to act as the Escrow Holder
hereunder by: (a) executing the Consent of Escrow Holder attached hereto; (b) delivering a copy of the executed Consent to Seller and Buyer and (c) delivering one (1) original of the Agreement to Seller and one (1) original
of the Agreement to Buyer at the address of Buyer’s counsel specified in Section 9.7.  5.2.1
Escrow Holder’s Investment Vehicle. The Escrow Holder may from time to time invest the Deposit and such other funds as are intended to be escrowed hereunder (the “Escrow Funds”) in a Bank of America Business Investment Account
for the benefit of the Buyer or such other account as Buyer may direct in writing. Buyer’s Federal Tax Identification Number is listed after its signature. The Escrow Holder shall not be responsible for any loss, diminution in value or failure
to achieve a greater profit as a result of such investments. Also, the Escrow Holder assumes no responsibility for, nor shall said Agent be held liable for, any loss occurring which arises from (i) failure of the depository institution,
(ii) the fact that some banking instruments, including without limitation repurchase agreements and letters of credit are not covered by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or (iii) the fact that the amount of the Escrow Deposit may
cause the aggregate amount of any depositor’s accounts to exceed $250,000 and that such excess amount is not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. 
5.2.2 Escrow Holder’s General Provisions. The Escrow Holder is not a trustee for any party for any purpose,
and is merely acting as a depository and in a ministerial capacity hereunder with the limited duties herein prescribed. The Escrow Holder may conclusively rely upon and act in accordance with any certificate, instructions, notice, letter, telegram,
cablegram other written instrument believed to be genuine and to have been signed or communicated by the proper party or parties.   
14 


5.2.3 Indemnification of Escrow Holder. The Seller and Buyer shall
indemnify, save, defend, keep and hold harmless the Escrow Holder from any and all loss, damage, cost, charge, liability, cost of litigation, or other expense, including without limitation attorney’s fees and court costs, arising out of its
obligations and duties, including but not limited to (i) disputes arising or concerning amounts of money to be paid, (ii) funds available for such payments, (iii) persons to whom payments should be made or (iv) any delay in the
electronic wire transfer of funds, as Escrow Holder, unless Escrow Holder’s actions constitute gross negligence or willful misconduct. 
5.3 Closing. The Closing shall take place on the Closing Date set forth in Section 1.5, as the same may be extended, provided
all conditions to the Closing have been satisfied or duly waived.  5.4 Conditions Precedent Favoring Buyer. In addition
to any other conditions precedent in favor of Buyer as may be expressly set forth elsewhere in this Agreement, Buyer’s obligations under this Agreement are subject to the timely fulfillment of the conditions set forth in this Section 5.4
on or before the Closing Date, or such earlier date as is set forth below. Each condition may be waived in whole or in part only, by written notice of such waiver from Buyer to Seller. 
5.4.1 Seller performing and complying in all material respects with all of the terms of this Agreement to be performed and
complied with by Seller prior to or at the Closing.  5.4.2 On the Closing Date, all of the representations and
warranties of Seller set forth herein shall be true, accurate and complete.  5.4.3 No later than three
(3) Business Days prior to the Closing Date, Seller shall have obtained an estoppel certificate from the tenant under the Lease on the Property in a form mutually agreed on by Buyer and Seller (“Threshold Estoppel”) dated no earlier
than sixty (60) days prior to Closing. The Threshold Estoppel shall be consistent with the Lease and shall not reveal any material, adverse matter or any claim of the same. 
5.4.4 No later than three (3) Business Days prior to the Closing Date, Seller shall have obtained a Subordination,
Non-Disturbance and Attornment Agreement from the tenant under the Lease on the Property (if required by Buyer) in a form provided by Buyer’s lender, if any, and reasonably acceptable to the tenant (“SNDA”). 
5.4.5 The tenant of the Land and Improvements will be in occupancy of the Land and Improvements, the Lease will be free
from any default on the part of Seller, as landlord, or the tenant, as tenant thereunder, and the tenant shall be paying rent and be current in the payment of all rentals due under the Lease. 
5.4.6 At Closing, the Title Company shall issue to Buyer an ALTA 2006 Owner’s Policy of Title Insurance (“Title
Policy”) insuring Buyer’s fee simple title to the Property for the sum equal to the Purchase Price subject only to the standard exclusions from coverage contained in such policy, conforming to the Required Title Condition set forth in
Section 2.3 above and containing such endorsements as Buyer shall have reasonably required.   
15 


5.4.7 There shall have been no material adverse change in the physical
condition of the Property from the end of the Due Diligence Period through the Closing Date, normal wear and tear excepted. 
5.4.8 Seller shall have delivered an estoppel certificate from the party, if any, entitled to enforce any restrictive
covenants encumbering the Property, confirming that there are no unpaid assessments or defaults under such restrictive covenants in a form substantially similar to Exhibit “H” attached hereto and incorporated by reference.
 5.4.9 Seller shall have determined the actual NOI for the first year of the term of the Lease. 
The conditions set forth in this Section 5.4 are solely for the benefit of Buyer and may be waived only by Buyer. At all times Buyer
has the right to waive any condition by giving written notice of such waiver to Seller and Escrow Agent. Such waiver or waivers must be in writing to Seller. If Buyer notifies Seller of a failure to satisfy the conditions precedent set forth in this
Section 5.4, Seller may, within five (5) days after receipt of Buyer’s notice, agree to satisfy the condition by written notice to Buyer, and Buyer shall thereupon be obligated to close the transaction provided (i) Seller so
satisfies such condition and (ii) no such right to cure shall extend the Close of Escrow. If Seller fails to agree to cure or fails to cure such condition by the Close of Escrow, this Agreement shall be automatically terminated, the Deposit
shall immediately be returned to Buyer without any further action required from either party and neither party shall have any continuing obligations hereunder; provided, however, if such failure constitutes a breach or default of its covenants,
representations or warranties Seller shall remain liable for such breach or default as otherwise set forth in this Agreement. 
5.5 Conditions Precedent Favoring Seller. In addition to any other condition precedent in favor of Seller as may be expressly set
forth elsewhere in this Agreement, Seller’s obligations under this Agreement are expressly subject to the timely fulfillment of the conditions set forth in this Section 5.5 on or before the Closing Date, or such earlier date as is set
forth below. Each condition may be waived in whole or part only by written notice of such waiver from Seller to Buyer. 
5.5.1 Buyer performing and complying in all material respects with all of the terms of this Agreement to be performed and
complied with by Buyer prior to or at the Closing.  5.5.2 On the Closing Date, all of the representations of
Buyer set forth in this Agreement shall be true, accurate and complete.  5.6 Seller’s Deliveries. At the Closing,
Seller shall deliver or cause to be delivered to Buyer, at Seller’s sole expense, each of the following items: 
5.6.1 A special warranty deed (the “Deed”) duly executed and acknowledged by Seller, substantially in the form
attached hereto as Exhibit “E”.  5.6.2 A bill of sale, general assignment and assignment
and assumption of lease (the “Bill of Sale and Assignment”) in the form attached hereto as Exhibit “F” which shall transfer, convey, sell, assign and set over to Buyer all of Seller’s right, title and interest in
and to the Personal Property, Lease, Tenant Deposit, Property Contracts, Intangible Property and Miscellaneous Property.   
16 


5.6.3 Originals of the Lease or any occupancy agreements (with all
amendments and modifications thereto) in Seller’s possession or control relating to the Property, together with the Threshold Estoppel required under Section 5.4.3 of this Agreement and the SNDA required under Section 5.4.4 of this
Agreement.  5.6.4 All keys in Seller’s possession to all locks on the Property and all documents in the
possession of Seller pertaining to the tenant of the Property, including all applications, correspondence and credit reports relating to such tenant. 
5.6.5 A non-foreign person affidavit sworn to by Seller as required by Section 1445 of the Code. 
5.6.6 Such evidence, documents, affidavits and indemnifications as may be reasonably required by the Title Company as a
precondition to the issuance of the Title Policy relating to: (i) mechanics’ or materialmen’s liens; (ii) parties in possession; (iii) the status and capacity of Seller and the authority of the person or persons who are
executing the various documents on behalf of Seller in connection with the sale of the Property; or (iv) any other matter reasonably required to enable the Title Company to issue the Title Policy and endorsements thereto. 
5.6.7 Originals of all Property Contracts assumed by Buyer and all other documents in the possession of Seller relating to
the operation of the Property including all permits, licenses, approvals, plans, specifications, guaranties and warranties. 
5.6.8 A duly executed closing statement reflecting the adjustments and prorations required by this Agreement (the
“Closing Statement”).  5.6.9 Such evidence or documents as may reasonably be required by Buyer
evidencing the power and authority of the Seller and its respective partners and the due authority of, and execution and delivery by, any person or persons who are executing any of the documents required in connection with the sale of the Property.
 5.6.10 Such other instruments as may be reasonably required to consummate the transactions contemplated by
this Agreement.  5.7 Buyer’s Deliveries. At the Closing, Buyer shall deliver to Seller the following items:
 5.7.1 Immediately available federal funds sufficient to pay the Purchase Price (less the Deposit and any
interest thereon) and Buyer’s share of all escrow costs and closing expenses.  5.7.2 Duly executed and
acknowledged originals of the Bill of Sale and Assignment and the Closing Statement.   
17 


5.7.3 Such evidence or documents as may reasonably be required by the Title
Company evidencing the status and capacity of Buyer and the authority of the person or persons who are executing the various documents on behalf of Buyer in connection with the purchase of the Property. 
5.7.4 Such evidence or documents as may reasonably be required by Seller evidencing the power and authority of the Buyer
and the due authority of, and execution and delivery by, any person or persons who are executing any of the documents required in connection with the purchase of the Property by Buyer. 
5.7.5 An owner’s affidavit and “gap” indemnity in such a form as the Escrow Holder may reasonably require.
 5.7.6 Such other instruments as may be reasonably required to consummate the transactions contemplated by this
Agreement.  5.8 Costs, Prorations and Credits. 
5.8.1 Closing Costs. Buyer and Seller shall each pay their own legal fees related to the preparation of this
Agreement and all documents required to settle the transaction contemplated hereby. Buyer shall pay (i) all extended title insurance premiums and title examination costs, (ii) all costs associated with its investigation of the Property,
including the cost of appraisals, architectural, engineering, credit and environmental reports, (iii) fifty percent (50%) of all escrow charges and (iv) all costs of obtaining the updated Survey. Seller shall pay (i) all transfer
taxes, if any, documentary stamp charges of any jurisdiction, if any, and recording fees, (ii) standard title insurance premiums, and (iii) fifty percent (50%) of all escrow charges. All other customary purchase and sale closing costs
shall be paid by Seller or Buyer in accordance with the custom in the jurisdiction where the Property is located. 
5.8.2 Prorations. The following shall be prorated, credited, debited and adjusted between Seller and Buyer as of
12:01 a.m. on the day of the Closing (except as otherwise provided) in accordance with this section. For purposes of calculating prorations, Buyer shall be deemed to be in title to the Property, and therefore entitled to the income and responsible
for the expenses, for the entire day upon which the Closing occurs.  (a) Current Rent. Tenant’s
rent, including payments for taxes, utilities, maintenance, operating expenses, or insurance, or additional charges of any other nature (collectively “Rent”), based on a rental statement prepared by Seller and approved by Buyer. 
 (b) Security Deposit, Unpaid Rent Concessions, Unpaid Tenant Improvement Allowances and Other Tenant
Credits. The amount of the unapplied tenant security deposit, any accrued interest due the tenant thereon, unpaid rent concessions due under the Lease, unpaid tenant improvement allowances owing under the Lease and the amount of any other
credits due the tenant shall be credited to Buyer based on a rental statement prepared by Seller and approved by Buyer (which statement must be consistent with the Lease, and the estoppel certificate). 
 
18 


(c) Unpaid Rents. Seller shall be entitled to all Unpaid Rents for
the period prior to Closing and Buyer shall be entitled to all Unpaid Rents from the date of Closing and thereafter. Any sums received by Buyer to which Seller is entitled shall be held in trust for Seller on account of such Unpaid Rents payable to
Seller, and Buyer shall remit to Seller any such sums received by Buyer to which Seller is entitled within ten (10) Business Days after receipt thereof. Seller expressly agrees that if Seller receives any Unpaid Rents after the Closing Date
which are attributable, in whole or in part, to any period after the Closing Date, Seller shall remit to Buyer that portion of the Unpaid Rents so received by Seller to which Buyer is entitled within ten (10) Business Days after receipt
thereof. Without limiting the foregoing, Seller specifically agrees not to undertake any effort to collect unpaid rent or other sums (however denominated) owed to Seller from any person if such person or any affiliate of such person is in possession
of any space in the Property at the time of any such collection effort.  (d) Property Taxes. The General
Services Administration, per the terms of the Lease of the Property, may reimburse real property taxes over the Lease-established “base tax year” amount as detailed in the Lease, and which are paid by the owners of the Property upon a
receipt of proof of payment of such taxes by the owner.  (e) Property Contracts. Prepaid charges in
connection with any Property Contracts that Buyer elects to assume, or licenses or permits, shall be credited to Seller. Accrued charges in connection with such Contracts, or licenses or permits, shall be credited to Buyer. 
(f) Private Assessments. Payments due under any assessments imposed by private covenant shall be prorated as of the
Closing.  (g) Utilities. Except to the extent such items are the responsibility of the tenant, prepaid
water, sewer, and other utility charges shall be credited to Seller, and accrued water, sewer, and other utility charges shall be credited to Buyer. 
(h) Leasing Commissions. On or before the Closing Date, Seller shall pay in full all leasing commissions due to
leasing or other agents for the current remaining term of the Lease (determined without regard to any unexercised termination or cancellation right). 
(i) Insurance Policies. Insurance premiums as to the policies, if any, that will continue after Closing.
 (j) Other Items. All other items customarily prorated or required by any other provision of this
Agreement to be prorated or adjusted.  5.8.3 Credits. In accordance with Section 5.8.2 above and at
Closing, Buyer shall receive a credit from Seller in the amount equal the anticipated remaining contractual expenses associated with the required building engineer per the terms outlined in the Lease. 
5.8.4 Re-prorations. At Closing, the amount of prorations and adjustments as aforesaid shall be determined or
estimated to the extent practicable, and monetary adjustment shall be made between Seller and Buyer. As the amounts of the respective items become finally ascertained, further adjustment shall be promptly made between the parties in cash.
  
19 


5.8.5 Survival. The provisions of this Section 5.8 shall survive
the Closing.  5.9 Distribution of Funds and Documents. At the Close of Escrow, Escrow Holder shall do each of the
following:  5.9.1 Payment of Encumbrances. Pay the amount of those monetary liens that are not permitted
as part of the Required Title Condition in accordance with the demands approved by Seller, utilizing funds to which Seller shall be entitled upon Close of Escrow and funds (if any) deposited in Escrow by Seller. 
5.9.2 Recorded Documents. Submit (or be irrevocably committed to submit) to the County or City Recorder of the
County or City in which the Property is located the Deed and each other document to be recorded under the terms of this Agreement or by general usage, and, after recordation, cause the County or City Recorder to mail the Deed to Buyer and each other
such document to the grantee, beneficiary or person acquiring rights thereunder or for whose benefit said document was recorded. 
5.9.3 Non-Recorded Documents. Deliver by overnight courier (or as otherwise requested by the intended recipient):
(i) the Title Policy to Buyer; (ii) each other non-recorded document received hereunder to the payee or person acquiring rights thereunder or for whose benefit said document was acquired; and (iii) a copy of each recorded document,
conformed to show the recording data thereon, to each party.  5.9.4 Distribution of Funds. Deliver
(i) to Seller, or order, the cash portion of the Purchase Price, adjusted for prorations, charges and other credits and debits provided for herein; and (ii) to Buyer, or order, any excess funds delivered to Escrow Holder by Buyer. Such
funds shall be delivered by wire transfer or cashier’s check in accordance with instructions for Seller and Buyer; if no instructions are given, Escrow Holder shall deliver such funds by Escrow Holder’s check via overnight courier (or as
otherwise requested by the intended recipient) to the appropriate party at the address set forth for notice in this Agreement. 
5.10 Completion of Documents. Escrow Holder is authorized to insert the date of Closing and otherwise to complete the documents
deposited in Escrow, where appropriate and consistent with this Agreement.  5.11 Possession and Tenant Notices.
Possession of the Property shall be delivered to Buyer by Seller at the Closing, subject only to the rights of the tenant under the Lease, rights arising under any Property Contracts not terminated by Buyer pursuant to Section 3.4 above, and
rights arising under the matters set forth in the Preliminary Report and permitted as part of the Required Title Condition. Seller and Buyer covenant and agree to execute at Closing a written notice of the acquisition of the Property by Buyer, for
transmittal to the tenant. Such notice shall be prepared by Buyer, at Buyer’s cost and expense, and approved by Seller, shall notify the tenant of the sale and transfer and shall contain appropriate instructions relating to the payment of
future rentals, the giving of future notices and other matters reasonably required by Buyer or required by law. Unless a different procedure is required by applicable law, in which event such laws shall be controlling, Buyer agrees to transmit or
otherwise deliver such letters to the tenant promptly after the Closing.   
20 


ARTICLE 6 - TERMINATION AND DEFAULT 
6.1 Buyer Default. If the sale contemplated hereby is not consummated because of a default by Buyer in its obligation to purchase
the Property in accordance with the terms of this Agreement after Seller has performed or tendered performance of all of its material obligations in accordance with this Agreement, then: (a) this Agreement shall terminate; (b) the Deposit
shall be paid to and retained by Seller; and (c) Seller and Buyer shall have no further obligations to each other except those which survive the termination of this Agreement. Buyer and Seller acknowledge that the damages to Seller in the event
of a breach of this Agreement by Buyer would be difficult or impossible to determine, that the amount of the deposit plus interest represents the parties’ best and most accurate estimate of the damages that would be suffered by Seller if the
transaction should fail to close and that such estimate is reasonable under the circumstances existing as of the date of this Agreement and under the circumstances that Seller and Buyer reasonably anticipate would exist at the time of such breach.
Buyer and Seller agree that Seller’s right to retain the Deposit together with any interest and earnings earned thereon shall be Seller’s sole remedy, at law and in equity, for Buyer’s failure to purchase the Property in accordance
with the terms of this Agreement. Seller hereby waives any right to an action for specific performance of any provisions of this Agreement. 
6.2 Seller’s Default. If prior to Closing Seller fails to perform any of its obligations or is otherwise in default
hereunder, Buyer shall have the right to exercise any or all of the following remedies:  6.2.1 Waive such
failure and proceed to the Closing with no reduction in the Purchase Price; provided, however, that this provision will not waive or affect Seller’s indemnity obligations under this Agreement or Buyer’s rights to enforce those indemnity
obligations, nor waive or affect any of Seller’s other obligations under this Agreement to be performed after the Closing or Buyer’s rights to enforce those obligations. 
6.2.2 Terminate this Agreement by notice to Seller and Escrow Holder to that effect, to recover the full amount of the
Deposit (including any interest thereon).  ARTICLE 7 - CASUALTY DAMAGE OR CONDEMNATION 
7.1 Casualty. If the Improvements are damaged by casualty prior to the Closing, Buyer shall have the sole option to elect either
to:  (a) acquire the Property as is (without reduction in the Purchase Price), plus an assignment without
recourse or credit of any insurance proceeds payable by virtue of such loss or damage plus a credit for any deductible or uninsured loss under said policy; or 
(b) terminate this Agreement and receive back the Deposit. 
 
21 


Such right must be exercised within ninety (90) days from the date
Seller provides Buyer with notice of the loss of the event giving rise to such right. If Buyer fails to provide notice of an election, then Buyer shall have been deemed to elect (b) above. 
7.2 Condemnation. In the event that any portion of the Property should be condemned prior to the Closing, at Buyer’s sole
option, elect either to:  (a) terminate this Agreement and receive back the Deposit; or 
(b) close the transaction contemplated by this Agreement. 
In all other cases, or if Buyer elects to proceed under Section 7.2(b), Buyer shall purchase the Property in accordance with the
terms hereof (without reduction in the Purchase Price) and Seller shall assign to Buyer at Closing all condemnation proceeds payable as a result of such condemnation. Buyer shall be deemed to have elected to proceed under
Section 7.2(a) unless, within ninety (90) days from written notice of the condemnation, Buyer provides Seller with written notice that Buyer elects to close the transaction contemplated by this Agreement pursuant to
Section 7.2(b).  ARTICLE 8 - REAL ESTATE COMMISSION 
Buyer and Seller each represent to the other that no broker’s or real estate commissions or other fees are or shall be due in
connection with the transactions contemplated hereunder other than a commission payable to Daniel Mackey of the Mackey Company (collectively, the “Broker”). Buyer agrees to pay any broker’s or real estate commissions or other fees
owed to Broker in accordance with a separate agreement between Buyer and Broker. Each party agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the other from and against any and all claims, demands or the cost or expense thereof, including reasonable
attorney’s fees, arising out of any broker’s commission, fee or other compensation due or alleged to be due in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement based upon an agreement alleged to have been made or other
action alleged to have been taken by the indemnifying party.  ARTICLE 9 - MISCELLANEOUS 
9.1 Entire Agreement. This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties hereto with respect to the transactions
contemplated herein, and it supersedes all prior discussions, understandings or agreements between the parties. All Exhibits and Schedules attached hereto are a part of this Agreement and are incorporated herein by reference. 
9.2 Binding On Successors and Assigns. Subject to Section 9.3, this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit
of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  9.3 Assignment by Buyer. Buyer may assign this
Agreement and Buyer’s rights under it only to an entity in which Buyer, or its affiliates, members or members’ principals, possess, directly or indirectly, the power to direct or cause the direction of its management and policies, whether
through the ownership of voting securities or otherwise, and any other   
22 



assignment is void. No such assignment will relieve Buyer of its obligations under this Agreement, and Buyer and the assignee will be jointly and severally liable for the performance of such
obligations after any such assignment. This Agreement binds, benefits, and may be enforced by the parties and their respective successors and permitted assigns. 
9.4 Waiver. The excuse or waiver of the performance by a party of any obligation of the other party under this Agreement shall
only be effective if evidenced by a written statement signed by the party so excusing or waiving. No delay in exercising any right or remedy shall constitute a waiver thereof, and no waiver by Seller or Buyer of the breach of any covenant of this
Agreement shall be construed as a waiver of any preceding or succeeding breach of the same or any other covenant or condition of this Agreement. 
9.5 Governing Law. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the internal laws of the State of Illinois, without
regard to the principles of conflicts of law.  9.6 Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in any number of
counterparts and it shall be sufficient that the signature of each party appear on one or more such counterparts. All counterparts shall collectively constitute a single agreement. 
9.7 Notices. All notices or other communications required or provided to be sent by either party shall be in writing and shall be
sent by: (i) United States Postal Service, certified mail, return receipt requested, (ii) any nationally known overnight delivery service for next day delivery, (iii) facsimile with written confirmation of receipt from sending
facsimile machine, or (iv) delivered in person. All notices shall be deemed to have been given on the date when deposited with the United States Postal Service or with any other nationally known overnight delivery service, on the date when a
facsimile is sent or on the date of personal delivery. All notices shall be addressed to the parties at the addresses below:   






 To Seller:
  
 SBC Archway II, LLC c/o
Archway Development, LLC 6161 South Syracuse Way
Suite 330 Greenwood, Colorado 80111
Telephone: (303) 721-9400 Facsimile: (3030)
721-9405 Email: mark.aukamp@archwaydev.com




 And with a copy to:
  
 Hayes, Hammer, Miles & Cox, LLP
202 North Center Bloomington, Illinois 61701
 Attention: Frank Miles, Esq.
Telephone: (309) 828-7331 Facsimile: (309)
827-7423 Email: fmiles@hhmcg.com  
23 








 To Buyer:
  
 BC Development Co., LLC
4705 Central Street Kansas City, MO
64112 Attention: Dan Carr Telephone:
816.268.7577 Facsimile: (816) 960-1441
Email: dcarr@lane4group.com




 And with a copy to:
  
 Gregory Kaplan, PLC - Attorneys At Law
7 East Second Street (23224-4253) Post Office
Box 2470 Richmond, VA 23218-2470
Attn: Christopher J. Hoctor Telephone: (804)
916-9035 Facsimile: (804) 916-9135
Email: choctor@gregkaplaw.com
Any address or name specified above may be changed by notice given to the addressee by the other party in accordance with this Section 9.7. The
inability to deliver notice because of a changed address of which no notice was given as provided above, or because of rejection or other refusal to accept any notice, shall be deemed to be the receipt of the notice as of the date of such inability
to deliver or rejection or refusal to accept. Any notice to be given by any party hereto may be given by the counsel for such party. 
9.8 Attorneys’ Fees. In the event of a judicial or administrative proceeding or action by one party against the other party
with respect to the interpretation or enforcement of this Agreement, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover reasonable costs and expenses including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys’ fees and expenses, whether at the
investigative, pretrial, trial or appellate level. The prevailing party shall be determined by the court based upon an assessment of which party’s major arguments or position prevailed. 
9.9 IRS Real Estate Sales Reporting. Buyer and Seller agree that Escrow Agent shall act as “the person responsible for
closing” the transaction which is the subject of this Agreement pursuant to Section 6045(e) of the Code and shall prepare and file all informational returns, including without limitation, IRS Form 1099-S, and shall otherwise comply
with the provisions of Section 6045(e) of the Code.  9.10 Time Periods. If the time for performance of any
obligation hereunder expires on a day that is not a Business Day, the time for performance shall be extended to the next Business Day. 
9.11 Modification of Agreement. No modification of this Agreement shall be deemed effective unless in writing and signed by the
party against whom enforcement is sought.  9.12 Further Instruments. Each party, promptly upon the request of the
other, shall execute and have acknowledged and delivered to the other or to the Escrow Holder, as may be appropriate, any and all further instruments reasonably requested or appropriate to evidence or give effect to the provisions of this Agreement
and which are consistent with the provisions of this Agreement.   
24 


9.13 Descriptive Headings; Word Meaning. The descriptive headings of the
paragraphs of this Agreement are inserted for convenience only and shall not control or affect the meaning or construction of any provisions of this Agreement. Words such as “herein,” “hereinafter,” “hereof’ and
“hereunder” when used in reference to this Agreement, refer to this Agreement as a whole and not merely to a subdivision in which such words appear, unless the context otherwise requires. The singular shall include the plural and the
masculine sender shall include the feminine and neuter, and vice versa, unless the context otherwise requires. The word “including” shall not be restrictive and shall be interpreted as if followed by the words “without
limitation”.  9.14 Business Day. As used herein, the term “Business Day” means any day other than
Saturday, Sunday and any day which is a legal holiday in the State of Illinois.  9.15 Construction of Agreement. This
Agreement shall not be construed more strictly against one party than against the other merely by virtue of the fact that it may have been prepared primarily by counsel for one of the parties, it being recognized that both Buyer and Seller have
contributed substantially and materially to the preparation of this Agreement.  9.16 Severability. The parties hereto
intend and believe that each provision in this Agreement comports with all applicable local, state and federal laws and judicial decisions. However, if any provision in this Agreement is found by a court of law to be in violation of any applicable
local, state or federal law, statute, ordinance, administrative or judicial decision, or public policy, or if in any other respect such a court declares any such provision to be illegal, invalid, unlawful, void or unenforceable as written, then it
is the intent of all parties hereto that, consistent with and with a view towards preserving the economic and legal arrangements among the parties hereto as expressed in this Agreement, such provision shall be given force and effect to the fullest
possible extent, and that the remainder of this Agreement shall be construed as if such illegal, invalid, unlawful, void or unenforceable provision were not contained herein, and that the rights, obligations and interests of the parties under the
remainder of this Agreement shall continue in full force and effect.  9.17 Exclusivity. After the Effective Date,
Seller and its respective agents, representatives and employees will abate all marketing efforts for the Land and Improvements. Any existing signs may remain. Any ordered advertising will be canceled, if cancelable without penalty; otherwise ordered
advertising may proceed, but no additional advertising will occur. Brokers and prospective buyers will not be shown the Land and Improvements and will be given only currently available printed information about the Land and Improvements prepared by
Seller’s broker.  9.18 Section 1031 Exchange. Either party may consummate the purchase or sale of the
Property as part of a so-called like kind exchange (an “Exchange”) pursuant to Section 1031 of the Code, provided that (i) the Closing shall not be delayed or affected by reason of an Exchange
  
25 



nor shall the consummation or accomplishment of any Exchange be a condition precedent or condition subsequent to a party’s obligations under this Agreement; (ii) any party desiring an
Exchange shall effect its Exchange through an assignment of this Agreement, or its rights under this Agreement, to a qualified intermediary and the other party shall not be required to take an assignment of the purchase agreement for the
relinquished or replacement property or be required to acquire or hold title to any real property for purposes of consummating such Exchange; and (iii) the party desiring an Exchange shall pay any additional costs that would not otherwise have
been incurred by Buyer or Seller had such party not consummated its purchase or sale through an Exchange. Neither party shall by this agreement or acquiescence to an Exchange desired by the other party (1) have its rights under this Agreement
affected or diminished in any manner or (2) be responsible for compliance with or be deemed to have warranted to the other party that such party’s Exchange in fact complies with Section 1031 of the Code. In connection with such
cooperation, Seller agrees, upon request of Buyer to “direct deed” for actual interests in the property to designees of Buyer. 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above. 
[Signatures appear on the following page]   
26 














SELLER:
 

 
 SBC Archway II, LLC,
a Colorado limited liability company








 

 

 
By:
 
/s/ Mark E. Aukamp


 

 

 
Name:
 
Mark E. Aukamp


 

 

 
Title:
 
Managing Member





BUYER:
 

 
 BC Development Co., LLC,
a Missouri limited liability company








 

 

 
By:
 
/s/ Richard Baier


 

 

 
Name:
 
Richard Baier


 

 

 
Title:
 
Principal


 

 

 
Federal Tax I.D.: 20-5164785  
27 


CONSENT OF ESCROW HOLDER 
The undersigned Escrow Holder hereby agrees to (i) accept the foregoing Agreement, (ii) be Escrow Holder under said Agreement
and (iii) be bound by said Agreement in the performance of its duties as Escrow Holder; provided, however, the undersigned shall have no obligations, liability or responsibility under (i) this Consent or otherwise unless and until said
Agreement, fully signed by the parties, has been delivered to the undersigned or (ii) any amendment to said Agreement unless and until the same shall be accepted by the undersigned in writing. 
 














DATED:
                                        

 

 
CHICAGO TITLE INSURANCE CORPORATION


 

 
(“Escrow Holder”)









 

 

 
By:
 
 
 
 


 

 

 

 
Its:
 
   
28 


EXHIBIT “A” 
LEGAL DESCRIPTION 
[to be attached]   
EXHIBIT “A” 
1 


EXHIBIT “B” 
LIST OF PERSONAL PROPERTY 
[to be attached]   
EXHIBIT “B” 
1 


EXHIBIT “C” 
LEASE 
[Brief Description to be attached]   
EXHIBIT “C” 
1 


EXHIBIT “D” 
CURRENT PROPERTY CONTRACTS 
[to be attached]   
EXHIBIT “D” 
1 


EXHIBIT “E” 
FORM OF DEED 
FORM OF DEED   










THE STATE OF ILLINOIS
  

  
§
  



  
§
  

  
KNOW ALL BY THESE PRESENTS:

COUNTY OF HARRIS
  
§
  

  
 THAT,
                                    , a
                                        
(“Grantor”), for and in consideration of the sum of Ten and No/100 Dollars ($10.00) in hand paid to Grantor by
                                        
(“Grantee”), the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged by Grantor, and other good and valuable consideration paid and agreed and secured to be paid to Grantor by Grantee in the manner set forth below, the sufficiency of which
consideration is hereby acknowledged by Grantor, has GRANTED, BARGAINED, SOLD, and CONVEYED and by these presents does GRANT, BARGAIN, SELL, and CONVEY unto said Grantee, its successors and assigns, subject to the Permitted Exceptions (as defined
below), all of that certain real property located in                             , Illinois, more
particularly described in Exhibit “A” attached hereto, together with all rights and appurtenances thereto, including any right, title and interest of Grantor, if any, in and to any adjacent streets, alleys, rights of way, rights of
ingress and egress and any reversionary interests, if any, in any way belonging to the foregoing (the “Property”). 
This conveyance is made by Grantor and accepted by Grantee expressly subject to the liens securing payment of real estate ad valorem
taxes for the current and all subsequent years, as well as to those matters set forth on Exhibit “B”, attached hereto and incorporated herein by reference (the “Permitted Exceptions”). Real estate ad valorem taxes on the
Property for the year 2010 have been prorated between Grantor and Grantee as of the date hereof and Grantee assumes the obligation to pay all of such taxes for such year. 
TO HAVE AND TO HOLD the Property, together with all and singular the rights and appurtenances thereto in anywise belonging, unto Grantee,
its successors and assigns forever; and subject to the above described Permitted Exceptions, Grantor does hereby bind itself and its successors, to WARRANT AND FOREVER DEFEND all and singular the Property unto Grantee, its successors and assigns,
against every person whomsoever lawfully claiming or to claim the same or any part thereof, by, through or under Grantor but not otherwise.   










Address of Grantee:
  
4705 Central Street
  

  



  
Kansas City, Missouri 64112
  

  
  
EXHIBIT “E” 
1 


EXECUTED effective the _____ day of ________________, 2010. 
 








 




By:
 
 

Name:
 
 

Title:
 
  STATE OF ILLINOIS 
COUNTY OF
                             
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me on the          day of
                    , 2010 by the 
said            
                                         
                                    of
                                         
               .   








  

Notary Public, State of Illinois  
EXHIBIT “E” 
2 


EXHIBIT “F” 
FORM OF BILL OF SALE AND ASSIGNMENT 
BILL OF SALE AND ASSIGNMENT 
This Bill of Sale and Assignment (“Assignment”), dated
                        ,             , is executed and
delivered pursuant to that certain Real Estate Purchase Agreement (the “Purchase Agreement”) dated as of             , 2010, by and between
                        
                                        
, a                                
(“Seller”),             and
                                         
       , a                                 
(“Buyer”), concerning the real property described in Exhibit “A” attached hereto (the “Land”). All capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the same meanings given them in the Purchase Agreement.
 1. Assignment. For good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby
acknowledged, the Seller hereby grants, sells, transfers, conveys and delivers to Buyer all of Seller’s interest in all of the following: 
(a) All furniture, equipment, machinery, inventories, supplies, signs and other tangible personal property of every kind
and nature, if any, owned by Seller and installed, located or situated on and used in connection with the operation of the Land or Improvements (the “Personal Property”), including, without limitation, the Personal Property listed on
Exhibit “B” attached hereto and incorporated herein by reference.  (b) All of Seller’s
rights in the lease and other occupancy agreements covering any portion of the Land or Improvements (the “Lease”) and which are listed on Exhibit “C” attached hereto and incorporated herein by reference including
Seller’s rights to any tenant deposit held by Seller (the “Tenant Deposit”) pursuant to the Lease. 
(c) All of Seller’s right, title and interest in all intangible assets of any nature relating to the Land, the
Improvements or the Personal Property, including, without limitation, all of Seller’s right, title, and interest in all (i) warranties and guaranties, if any, relating to the Improvements or Personal Property in the possession of Seller as
set forth on Exhibit “D” attached hereto and incorporated herein, (ii) all use, occupancy, building and operating licenses, permits, approvals and development rights (iii) any trade name or names used or utilized in connection
with the Land and Improvements and (iv) all plans and specifications related to the Land and Improvements, in each case to the extent that Seller may legally transfer the same (the “Intangible Property”). 
(d) All of Seller’s rights in the service contracts affecting the Land or Improvements which are listed on
Exhibit “D” attached hereto and incorporated herein by reference (the “Property Contracts”). 
(e) All rights, which Seller may have, if any, in and to any tenant data, telephone numbers and listings, all master keys,
all good will, if any, and any and all other rights, privileges and appurtenances owned by Seller and related to or used in connection with the existing business operation of the Property. 
 
EXHIBIT “F” 
1 


2. Acceptance and Assumption. Buyer hereby accepts the foregoing
Assignment. Seller acknowledges that Buyer does not, except as otherwise specifically provided in the Agreement, assume, directly or indirectly, any liability, obligation, duty or responsibility whatsoever for the payment, discharge or other
resolution of any liability, obligation, indebtedness, lien, security interest, encumbrance, claim or other problem, condition or matter required to be performed in connection with the Intangible Property prior to the date of this Assignment.
 3. Indemnifications. Seller shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless Buyer from and against any
liability, damages, causes of action, expenses, and attorneys’ fees incurred by Buyer by reason of the failure of Seller to fulfill, perform, discharge, and observe its obligations with respect to the Lease and the Property Contracts required
to be performed before the Closing Date (as defined in the Purchase Agreement). Buyer shall defend, indemnify and hold harmless Seller from and against any liability, damages, causes of action, expenses, and attorneys’ fees incurred by Seller
by reason of the failure of Buyer to fulfill, perform, discharge, and observe the obligations assumed by it under this instrument with respect to the Lease or the Property Contracts required to be performed on or after the Closing Date. 
4. Miscellaneous. 
(a) Seller and Buyer each agrees to execute such other documents and perform such other acts as may be reasonably
necessary or desirable to effectuate this Assignment.  (b) In the event of any action or suit by either party
hereto against the other arising from or interpreting this Assignment, the prevailing party in such action or suit shall, in addition to such other relief as may be granted, be entitled to recover its costs of suit and actual attorney’s fees,
whether or not the same proceeds to final judgment.  (c) This Assignment shall be governed by and construed in
accordance with the laws of the State of Illinois.  (d) This Assignment shall be binding upon and inure to the
benefit of Seller and Buyer and their respective successors and assigns.   
EXHIBIT “F” 
2 


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Seller and Buyer have executed this Assignment as of the date first
above written.   












 SELLER:
 

 
                          
                      , a


 

 
________________________








 

 

 
By:
 
 


 

 

 
Name:
 
 


 

 

 
Title:
 
 


 

 

 
Federal Tax I.D.:
                                         
                                         






 BUYER:
 

 
                          
                      , a






 

 
_______________________








 

 

 
By:
 
 


 

 

 
Name:
 
 


 

 

 
Title:
 
  LIST OF EXHIBITS
  






 EXHIBIT “A”
  
LEGAL DESCRIPTION

 EXHIBIT “B”
  
PERSONAL PROPERTY INVENTORY

 EXHIBIT “C”
  
LEASE

 EXHIBIT “D”
  
CURRENT PROPERTY CONTRACTS  
EXHIBIT “F” 
3 


EXHIBIT “G” 
PROPERTY INFORMATION   


1.
Any current outstanding tenant improvements required of the Seller and any outstanding funds owed to the tenant by the Seller. 
 


2.
Complete access to the lease relating to the Property.   


3.
A current report outlining tenant’s name; current rental rate; any prepaid or delinquent rent; any deposits, whether refundable or nonrefundable; and any rental
concessions.   


4.
A current financial statement of Property operations (updated quarterly), including, but not limited to, a statement of revenues and expenses, balance sheets, and a
statement of cash flow from the inception of the lease relating to the Property and a 2010 Budget. (Should Buyer desire to obtain audited financial statements it may do so, subject to the terms and conditions of the Agreement, at its sole cost and
expense.)   


5.
Capital Improvements, if any, that are planned for the next two (2) years; include description and estimated costs. 
 


6.
Year-to-date copies of the general ledgers related to the Property (updated quarterly) and copies of Seller’s general ledger since the inception of the lease on
the Property detailing individual revenue and expense transactions or invoices. Bank statements and paid invoices which support the general ledger entries will also be provided. 
 


7.
Copies of current Property tax and insurance bills and insurance certificates and evidence of insurance premiums paid. 
 


8.
Copies of utility bills since issuance of the certificate of occupancy for the building. 
 


9.
Copies of any existing management, service, or maintenance contracts pertaining to the operation of the Property and invoices thereof since issuance of the certificate
of occupancy for the building.   


10.
Copies of any personal property rental agreements pertaining to personal property or business equipment used in the operation of the Property. 
 


11.
Latest environmental, engineering, and structural reports, if any exist.   


12.
A set of as-built drawings.   


13.
Copy of the latest survey, if one exists.   


14.
Copies of certificates of occupancy.   
EXHIBIT “G” 




15.
Copies of any zoning and/or conditional use or similar permits or actions permitting the current use of the Property. 
 


16.
Any other items reasonably requested by Buyer, provided that receipt and approval of these items shall not delay the Closing or the expiration of the Due Diligence
Period.   
EXHIBIT “G” 


EXHIBIT “H” 
FORM ESTOPPEL CERTIFICATE 
THIS ESTOPPEL CERTIFICATE (this “Certificate”) is made the
             day of
                                 , 2010, by
                        
                                         
                            (“Grantor”), in favor of
                                         
                                (“Grantee”), and
                                         
                   , a Delaware limited liability company (“Purchaser”). 
RECITALS  A.
Grantor and Grantee executed that certain Reciprocal Easement and Restrictive Covenants Agreement dated
                             and recorded as Instrument Number
                                 on
                                 in the Official Records of
                                        ,
                             (the “Agreement”). 
B. The Agreement establish certain covenants with respect the certain real property located in __________________________ and described
on Exhibit “A” attached hereto and incorporated by reference (the “Property”).  C. On the date hereof,
Grantee is the                          owner of the Property. Grantee has agreed to sell the Property to Purchaser and
Purchaser has agreed to buy the Property from Grantee.  D. Grantee and Purchaser desire for Grantor to confirm the status of
the Agreement and certify certain facts with respect to the Agreement.  NOW, THEREFORE, for and in consideration of Ten
Dollars ($10.00) and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, Grantor hereby certifies as follows: 
1. The Agreement is in full force and effect in accordance with their respective terms and each constitutes the entire agreement with
respect to the subject matter thereof.  2. The Agreement has not been further modified, supplemented or amended in any respect
and no material term thereunder has been waived by any party.  3. No event has occurred or situation exists which would, with
the passage of time, the giving of notice, or both, constitute a default by Grantee under the Agreement.  4. Grantee is in
full compliance with all applicable provisions of the Agreement.  5. All maintenance, repair and other obligations under the
Agreement required to be performed by Grantee as of the date hereof have been satisfied.   
EXHIBIT “H” 


6. There are no outstanding sums due from Grantee with respect to the maintenance repair or
any other obligation pursuant to the Agreement.  7. Grantor and its affiliates have no rights (vested or contingent) to
repurchase the Property pursuant to ______________ of Agreement or otherwise.  8. Grantor hereby confirms that it
(i) received notice of Grantee’s proposed sale of the Property to Purchase in accordance with the terms of Agreement, (ii) hereby waives and releases any rights Grantor has under the terms of Agreement with respect to Grantee’s
proposed sale of the Property to Purchaser, including without limitation any rights of Grantor relating to its right of first offer set forth in Agreement, and (iii) Grantor has communicated to Grantee that Grantor has no interest in acquiring
the Property from Grantor.  9. Grantor agrees that from and after the date hereof it shall cause a copy of any written notice
sent to Grantee pursuant to either of the Agreement to be simultaneously delivered to Purchaser at the address listed below in accordance with the provisions of the particular Agreement: 
 






To Purchaser:
  
 c/o BC Development Co., LLC
4705 Central Street Kansas City, Missouri 64112
 Attention: Dan Carr Telephone:
816.268.7577 Facsimile: (816) 960-1441
Email: dcarr@lane4group.com




And with a copy to:
  
 Gregory Kaplan, PLC
7 East Second Street Richmond, Virginia 23224
 Attn: Christopher J. Hoctor
Telephone: (804) 916-9035 Facsimile: (804)
916-9045 E-mail: choctor@gregkaplaw.com
10. No legal action has been instituted by Grantor or its agents against Grantee, Purchaser, the Property or any other party to the
Agreement.  11. Grantor acknowledges that Purchaser will rely on this Certificate in purchasing the Property from Grantee, and
that without this Certificate the Purchaser would not purchase the Property. This Certificate shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. This Certificate shall not be modified
other than by an instrument in writing signed by the parties hereto or their respective successors and assigns. This Certificate shall estop the Grantor from asserting a defense or claim against Purchaser which is inconsistent with the facts
contained in this Certificate.   
EXHIBIT “H” 


[Remainder of page intentionally left blank; signatures appear on following page] 
 
EXHIBIT “H” 


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Grantor has caused this Certificate to be executed as of the date and year first above
written.  GRANTOR: 
                         
                                         
                  ,  a
                                         
                                        
 











By:
 
 

Name:
 
 

Title:
 
  LIST OF EXHIBITS
  






 EXHIBIT “A”
  
LEGAL DESCRIPTION  
EXHIBIT “H” 


FIRST AMENDMENT TO REAL ESTATE PURCHASE AGREEMENT 
THIS FIRST AMENDMENT TO REAL ESTATE PURCHASE AGREEMENT (this “First Amendment”) is entered into as of this 14th
day of July, 2010, by and between SBC Archway II, LLC, a Colorado limited liability company (“Seller”), and BC Development Co., LLC, a Missouri limited liability company (“Buyer”). 
RECITALS 
A. Seller and Buyer entered into that certain Real Estate Purchase Agreement dated June 15, 2010 (the “Original
Agreement”) pursuant to which Seller agreed to sell, and Buyer agreed to purchase, certain parcels of real property and more particularly described in the Original Agreement. 
B. Seller and Buyer desire to amend the Original Agreement as set forth herein. 
AGREEMENT 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the promises and mutual agreements contained herein, and other good and valuable consideration, the
receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto do hereby agree as follows:  1. Due Diligence
Period. Section 3.2 of the Original Agreement is hereby deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following: 
3.2 Due Diligence Period. Buyer shall have from the Effective Date of this Agreement until August 23, 2010
(the “Due Diligence Period”) to physically inspect the Property, review the economic data, underwrite the tenants and review the Leases, conduct appraisals, perform examinations of the physical condition of the Improvements, examine the
Property for the presence of Hazardous Materials (as defined below), and to otherwise conduct such due diligence review of the Property and all of the items to be furnished by Seller to Buyer pursuant to Section 3.3 below, and all records and
other materials related thereto as Buyer deems appropriate.  2. Entire Agreement. The Original Agreement, as modified
by this First Amendment, constitutes the entire agreement between the parties hereto with respect to the transactions contemplated therein. Except as modified by this First Amendment, the Original Agreement remains unchanged and unmodified and in
full force and effect, and the parties hereto hereby ratify and affirm the same.  3. Counterparts. This First Amendment
may be executed in any number of counterparts and it shall be sufficient that the signature of each party appear on one or more such counterparts. All counterparts shall collectively constitute a single agreement. Signatures to this First Amendment
transmitted by facsimile or electronic mail shall be treated as originals in all respects. 


[Remainder of page intentionally left blank; signatures appear on following pages]
  
2 


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have entered into this First Amendment as of the date
above first written.   












SELLER:
 

 
 SBC Archway II, LLC,
a Colorado limited liability company








 

 

 
By:
 
/s/ Mark E. Aukamp


 

 

 
Name:
 
Mark E. Aukamp


 

 

 
Title:
 
Managing Member





BUYER:
 

 
 BC Development Co., LLC,
a Missouri limited liability company








 

 

 
By:
 
/s/ Dan Carr


 

 

 
Name:
 
Dan Carr


 

 

 
Title:
 
Principal


 

 

 
Federal Tax I.D.: 20-5164785
Signature Page to First Amendment to Real Estate Purchase Agreement 


SECOND AMENDMENT TO REAL ESTATE PURCHASE AGREEMENT 
THIS SECOND AMENDMENT TO REAL ESTATE PURCHASE AGREEMENT (this “Second Amendment”) is entered into as of this 20th
day of September, 2010, by and between SBC Archway II, LLC, a Colorado limited liability company (“Seller”), and BC Development Co., LLC, a Missouri limited liability company (“Buyer”). 
RECITALS 
A. Seller and Buyer entered into that certain Real Estate Purchase Agreement dated June 15, 2010, as amended by that certain First
Amendment to Real Estate Purchase Agreement dated July 14, 2010 (collectively, the “Original Agreement”) pursuant to which Seller agreed to sell, and Buyer agreed to purchase, certain parcels of real property and more
particularly described in the Original Agreement.  B. Seller and Buyer desire to amend the Original Agreement as set forth
herein.  AGREEMENT 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the promises and mutual agreements contained herein, and other good and valuable consideration, the
receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereby agree as follows:  1. Closing Date.
Section 1.5 of the Original Agreement is hereby deleted and replaced with the following:  1.5 Closing
Date. The Closing shall take place through an escrow opened with Escrow Holder on or before October 15, 2010 (the “Closing Date”). Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Buyer has the right, upon five (5) Business Days’
notice to Seller, to accelerate the Closing Date. In addition to the foregoing, the Buyer and Seller may elect to hold the Closing at such other place and on such other later date as Buyer and Seller may mutually agree in writing. For purposes of
this Agreement “Close of Escrow” or “Closing” means the date Escrow Holder disburses funds in accordance with this Agreement and is irrevocably committed to record the Deed in favor of Buyer. 
2. Entire Agreement. The Original Agreement, as modified by this Second Amendment, constitutes the entire agreement between the
parties hereto with respect to the transactions contemplated therein. Except as modified by this Second Amendment, the Original Agreement remains unchanged and unmodified and in full force and effect, and the parties hereto hereby ratify and affirm
the same.  3. Counterparts. This Second Amendment may be executed in any number of counterparts and it shall be
sufficient that the signature of each party appear on one or more such 



counterparts. All counterparts shall collectively constitute a single agreement. Signatures to this Second Amendment transmitted by facsimile or electronic mail shall be treated as originals in
all respects.  [Remainder of page intentionally left blank; signatures appear on following pages]
  
2 


IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have entered into this Second Amendment as of the
date above first written.   








SELLER:
 
SBC Archway II, LLC,


 
a Colorado limited liability company






 
By:
 
 /s/ Mark E. Aukamp


 
Name:
 
Mark E. Aukamp


 
Title:
 
Managing Member




BUYER:
 
BC Development Co., LLC, a Missouri limited liability company






 
By:
 
 /s/ Richard Baier


 
Name:
 
Richard Baier


 
Title:
 
Principal


 
Federal Tax I.D.: 20-5164785  
Signature Page to Second Amendment to Real Estate Purchase Agreement 
